Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-227
Case Management Systems Software Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Case Management Systems Software Cash Fund is created. The State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of money remitted pursuant to section 33-107.04. The Supreme Court may use the fund to aid in defraying the costs of purchasing, implementing, and maintaining electronic case management systems.

(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 37.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.